Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.415

Power wheelchair.

"Power wheelchair" means any self-propelled vehicle capable of traveling no more than fifteen miles per hour, usable indoors, designed as a mobility aid for individuals with mobility impairments, and operated by such an individual.

[ 2003 c 141 s 1.]

NOTES:

Wheelchair conveyance: RCW 46.04.710.